Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.859

Rural development council—Successor organization—Funding.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in chapter 41.06 RCW or any other provision of law, the department may contract to provide funding to a successor organization under *RCW 43.31.856 to carry out activities of the organization that are consistent with the department's powers and duties. All moneys for contracts entered into under this section are subject to appropriation.

[ 1999 c 299 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.31.856 was repealed by 1999 c 299 s 6, effective June 30, 2002.